Mississippi, session 2026, SB3236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the City of Indianola for the purpose of defraying costs associated with the construction of a public safety municipal complex to house the city's fire station, police department and municipal court at the intersection of State Highway 82 and State Highway 49 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $ 2,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  It is the intent of the Legislature for the City of Indianola to draw down federal funds with the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.